parSem/xip/dev/GRAMMARS/GERMAN/FST1/src/rules-prop.xfst
# ============================================================================
# TYPE:		(x)fst
# CONTENT:	German morphology : morphophonological rules for proper names
#
# AUTHOR:	A. Schiller
#
# CREATED:     	10-Jan-2007
# ============================================================================
# USAGE:	xfst -s LEX.fst -l [ThisFile]
# ============================================================================

define LEX

define FLAGUPP	"@U.frm.upp@" ;
define FLAGLOW	"@U.frm.low@" ;

define UPP	[A|B|C|D|E|F|G|H|I|J|K|L|M|N|O|P|Q|R|S|T|U|V|W|X|U|Z|Ä|Ö|Ü];
define LOW	[a|b|c|d|e|f|g|h|i|j|k|l|m|n|o|p|q|r|s|t|u|v|w|x|u|z|ä|ö|ü|ß];


# --------------------------------------------------------------
# echo >>> genitive singular of proper names
# Goethe+GenS -> Goethes
# Lenz+GenS -> Lenz', ?Lenzens
# Strauss+GenS -> Strauss', Straussens

# echo >>> plural s of last names
# Müller^PPl -> Müllers
# Lenz^PPl  -> Lenzens

define SNAME	[ s | ß | x | z ] ;

read regex [
	LEX
.o.	%+GenS (->) %' || SNAME _
.o.	[ %+GenS | %^PPl ] -> {ens} || SNAME _
.o.	[ %+GenS | %^PPl ] -> s

];


# derivations of last names
define LEX

read regex [
     	%} i <- %^I
.o.	LEX 
.o.	%^I (->) %'	# schiller'sch
.o.	%^I (->) i || \[a|ä|e|i|o|ö|u|ü|y]  _ {sch}	# schillersch
.o.	%^I -> 0
];


# --------------------------------------------------------
# insert initial lower case for derivations

# --------------------------------------------------------------
# echo >>> upper/lower case (for derivations)
define LEX


read regex [
	[ [FLAGUPP|FLAGLOW] LEX ]

.o.	a->A, ä->Ä, b->B, c->C, d->D, e->E, f->F, g->G, h->H, 
	i->I, j->J, k->K, l->L, m->M, n->N, o->O, ö->Ö, p->P,
	q->Q, r->R, s->S, t->T, u->U, ü->Ü, v->V, w->W, x->X, 
	y->Y, z->Z || FLAGUPP _

.o.	A->a, Ä->ä, B->b, C->c, D->d, E->e, F->f, G->g, H->h, 
	I->i, J->j, K->k, L->l, M->m, N->n, O->o, Ö->ö, P->p,
	Q->q, R->r, S->s, T->t, U->u, Ü->ü, V->v, W->w, X->x, 
	Y->y, Z->z || FLAGLOW  _
] ;
